Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 6
DIVISION OF AVIATION

28-6-101 to 28-6-114. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article repealed, p. 1135, § 224, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1988. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to the aeronautics division in the department of transportation, see article 10 of title 43.